California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
This part may be cited as the Parking Law of 1949.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

32501.

The supplying of additional parking facilities and the performance of all undertakings incidental or advantageous thereto are public uses and purposes for which public money may be spent and private property acquired, and are governmental functions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

32502.

This part shall not affect any other provision of law relating to the same or a similar subject but provides an alternative method of procedure governing the subject to which it relates; and it shall not abridge, modify or otherwise affect the right of any city to exercise any power given to it by the Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

32503.

Parking facilities of an authority are subject to the planning, zoning, sanitary, and building laws, ordinances, and regulations applicable to the locality in which they are situated. In the planning and location of any parking facility, an authority is subject to the relationship of the facility to any officially adopted master plan or sections of such master plan for the development of the area in which the authority functions to the same extent as if it were a private entity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1388.)
-------------------------------------------

32504.

If any provision of this part, or its application to any person or circumstance, is held invalid, the remainder of the part, or the application of such provision to other persons or circumstances, shall not be affected thereby.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

32505.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions set forth in this chapter govern the construction of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

32506.

“Authority” or “parking authority” means any of the public corporations created by Chapter 2 of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

32507.

“City” means any city or city and county, or in the case of a county parking authority, means any county, including incorporated portions thereof. “The city” means the particular city, county, or city and county, for which a particular authority is created.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 602.)
-------------------------------------------

32508.

“Legislative body” means, in the case of a city, that body in which the general legislative powers of the city are vested, and in the case of a county or a city and county, the board of supervisors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 602.)
-------------------------------------------

32509.

“Mayor” means the mayor of the city or the officer charged with the duties customarily imposed on the mayor or executive head of the city. In the case of a county parking authority “mayor” means the chairman of the board of supervisors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 602.)
-------------------------------------------

32510.

“Clerk” means the clerk of the city or the officer charged with the duties customarily imposed on the clerk. In the case of a county parking authority “clerk” means the clerk of the board of supervisors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 602.)
-------------------------------------------

32511.

“Obligee of the authority” or “obligee” means any of the following:

(a) Any bondholder or trustee for any bondholders.

(b) Any lessor demising to the authority property used in connection with a parking facility or any assignee of all or part of such lessor’s interest.

(c) The State or the United States, or any agency of either, when a party to any contract with an authority by which aid or a loan is given or made to the authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

32512.

“State public body” means the State, or any city, city and county, county, district, authority, or any other subdivision or public body of the State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

32513.

“Project” means any acquisition, improvement, construction, or undertaking of any kind authorized by this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

32514.

“Parking facilities” includes public transportation terminal facilities and other facilities related thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 965.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Parking Authorities [32650. - 32667.]

32650.

There is in each city and in each county of the state a public body corporate and politic known as the parking authority of the city or the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 602.)
-------------------------------------------

32651.

The authority shall not transact any business or exercise any powers unless and until the legislative body of the city by resolution declares that there is need for the authority to function in the city.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1388.)
-------------------------------------------

32652.

The determination that there is need for an authority to function may be made by the legislative body on its own motion, or upon the filing of a petition signed by 100 residents of the city, asserting that there is need for an authority to function in the city and requesting that the legislative body so declare.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

32653.

In any suit, action, or proceeding by or against or in any manner relating to an authority, the authority shall be conclusively deemed to have become established and authorized to transact business and exercise its powers upon proof of the adoption of the resolution by the legislative body declaring the need for the authority to function.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1388.)
-------------------------------------------

32654.

A city shall not transact any business or exercise any powers pursuant to Section 33552 of this part unless and until the legislative body of the city declares by resolution that there is need for the city to exercise the powers of a parking authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

32655.

Either or both resolutions provided for in this chapter may be adopted by the legislative body. If both resolutions are adopted, they shall clearly specify the areas within the city within which, or the projects over which, the authority and the city, respectively, are to have jurisdiction and control. The division of jurisdiction and control shall be as specified, but may be changed from time to time to such extent as is consistent with obligations to bondholders, by action of both the legislative body and the authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

32656.

When the legislative body of a city first adopts a resolution declaring need for a parking authority to function, the mayor, with the approval of the legislative body, shall appoint five electors of the city as members of the authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

32657.

(a) Three of the members first appointed shall be designated by the mayor, with the approval of the legislative body, to serve for terms of one, two, and three years, respectively, from a date specified by the mayor in their appointments, and two shall be designated to serve for terms of four years from that date. Thereafter, members shall be appointed for a term of four years. All vacancies occurring during a term shall be filled for the unexpired term. A member shall hold office until his or her successor has been appointed and has qualified.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), in any charter city having a parking and traffic commission created by the city’s charter, the mayor, with the approval of the legislative body, may require the members of that commission to serve ex officio as members of the parking authority and to exercise all the powers and duties thereof. Upon the appointment of persons as commissioners of the city’s parking and traffic commission, those commissioners shall replace the members of a parking authority appointed pursuant to subdivision (a) and shall succeed to the powers and duties of those members as provided in this chapter.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b) or Section 32656, in any charter city having a board of directors of a public transportation agency created by the city’s charter, five or more members of the board of directors may serve ex officio as members of the parking authority and exercise all the powers and duties thereof during their terms as members of the board of directors. Persons appointed as members of the public transportation agency’s board of directors may replace the members of a parking authority appointed pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) and may succeed to the powers and duties of those members as provided in the city’s charter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 130, Sec. 1.   Effective July 9, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

32657.5.

The authority shall hold meetings at such times as it shall determine. The concurring votes of three members of the authority shall be required for the taking of any action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1388.)
-------------------------------------------

32658.

The mayor shall designate the first chairman. Thereafter, when the office of chairman becomes vacant the authority shall elect a chairman from its members. Unless otherwise prescribed by the legislative body, the term of office of the chairman shall be for the calendar year, or for that portion of the year remaining after the chairman is designated or elected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

32661.

A member of an authority may be removed by the mayor with the consent of the legislative body.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

32661.1.

As an alternative to the appointment of five members of the parking authority, the legislative body may, at the time of the adoption of a resolution pursuant to Section 32651 of this part, declare itself to be the parking authority, in which case all the rights, powers, duties, privileges, and immunities vested by this part in the members of the parking authority shall be vested in the legislative body as the parking authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1408.)
-------------------------------------------

32661.2.

Whenever the mayor, with the approval of the legislative body, has appointed the members of a parking authority, as provided by Section 32656, the legislative body, after receipt from the parking authority of a resolution adopted by a majority vote of the parking authority consenting thereto, may adopt a resolution declaring itself to be the parking authority, in which case all the rights, powers, duties, privileges, and immunities vested by this part in the members of the parking authority appointed under Section 32656 shall be vested in the legislative body as the parking authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1408.)
-------------------------------------------

32661.3.

A legislative body which has declared itself to be the parking authority pursuant to Sections 32661.1 or 32661.2 may, at any time, by resolution, determine that it shall no longer function as the parking authority, in which event the mayor, with the approval of the legislative body, shall appoint five electors of the city as members of the parking authority, as provided in Sections 32656 and 32657.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1408.)
-------------------------------------------

32662.

At the time the authority becomes authorized to transact business and exercise its powers, and from time to time thereafter, the legislative body, subject to its fiscal law, may make an estimate of the amount of money required for administrative purposes of the authority, and by a two-thirds vote, appropriate such amounts to the authority as it deems necessary, subject to such conditions as it prescribes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

32663.

Quarterly, semiannually, or annually, as the legislative body prescribes, the authority shall file with the legislative body a detailed report of all its transactions, including a statement of all revenues and expenditures.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

32664.

At least once annually, the authority shall submit a statement of all its financial affairs, audited by independent certified public accountants, to the legislative body of the city.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 843.)
-------------------------------------------

32665.

If within four years after the adoption of a resolution declaring the need for a parking authority to function in a city, the authority has not acquired or entered into possession of land for a parking facility, issued bonds, or entered into any contract for the acquisition, construction, or operation of a parking facility, the legislative body by resolution may declare that there is no need for the authority to function in the city. Upon the adoption of such resolution, the offices of the members of the authority become vacant and the capacity of the authority to transact business or exercise any power is suspended until the legislative body again adopts a resolution declaring the need for the authority to function.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1388.)
-------------------------------------------

32665.5.

Upon the termination of any such suspension by the adoption of such resolution declaring the need for the authority to function, appointments of the members of such authority shall be made, and other proceedings for the organization and activation of the authority had and taken as if such resolution were the original resolution declaring need for a parking authority to function provided for by Section 32651. However, if such termination of any such suspension occurs within the term for which any member or members of the authority has or have been appointed, such member or members whose terms have not expired shall ipso facto by such termination be restored to office as such member or members, and shall serve for the remainder of his or their unexpired term or terms, as if such suspension had not occurred.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1388.)
-------------------------------------------

32666.

After adoption of a resolution declaring there is no need for an authority to function, and while it is in effect, the legislative body may wind up the affairs of the authority and has title to all property of the authority for such purpose and for the benefit of the city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

32667.

At any time after the activation of a parking authority, the legislative body by a two-thirds vote may adopt a resolution transferring the property of the authority to the city, and the city may, through such department, board, officer, or agency, as it determines, exercise its powers in regard to such property by virtue of the Constitution, its charter, this part or any general law. No such transfer shall be made in contravention of any covenant or agreement made with the holders of bonds of the authority issued and outstanding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1388.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Powers [32801. - 32812.]

32801.

The authority may:

(a) Sue and be sued, have a seal, and make and execute contracts and other instruments necessary or convenient to the exercise of its powers.

(b) Make, and from time to time amend and repeal, by-laws and regulations not inconsistent with this part to carry into effect the powers and purposes hereof. 

(c) Select and appoint or remove such permanent and temporary officers, agents, counsel, and employees, as it requires, and may determine their qualifications, duties, and compensation. The powers of the authority under this subdivision are subject to all limitations and rights applicable to similar employment by the city, unless by resolution the legislative body otherwise determines.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

32802.

The authority may:

(a) Purchase, lease, obtain option upon, acquire by gift, grant, bequest, devise, or otherwise, any real or personal property within or outside the city, or any interest in, or improvements on, such property. However, no property of a state public body may be acquired without its consent.

(b) Acquire any property by the exercise of the power of eminent domain, except that property of a state public body shall not be acquired without its consent.

(c) Sell, lease, exchange, transfer, assign, or otherwise dispose of any real or personal property or any interest in such property.

(d) Lay out, open, extend, widen, straighten, establish, or change the grade, in whole or in part, of public parking facilities and public rights of way necessary or convenient for such facilities.

(e) Insure any of its real or personal property or operations against risks or hazards.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1388.)
-------------------------------------------

32803.

The authority may acquire, construct, rent, lease, maintain, repair, manage and operate all or any portion of any real and personal property, including the leasing of the operation of the property, and the leasing for commercial purposes of surplus space or space which it is not economic to use for parking purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1388.)
-------------------------------------------

32804.

As an incident to the operation of any parking facility, the authority may devote a portion of its property to uses such as retail stores, bus terminal, gasoline service station, helicopter landing area, or any other commercial use, when in its judgment it is convenient or necessary to conduct or permit such use in order to utilize properly the property as a parking facility. Any such incidental use shall be secondary to the primary use as a parking facility, and the portion of the land devoted to the incidental use shall not exceed 25 percent of the surface area of the property. If a building is erected on the property for the purpose of parking motor vehicles, the incidental use of the building shall not occupy more than 25 percent of the floor area.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

32805.

Neither the authority nor the city shall manage or operate surplus space devoted to commercial purposes other than parking of vehicles, but shall lease such space to private operators.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

32806.

The authority may do any act to furnish motor vehicle parking space, to establish parking facilities for motor vehicles within the city, and to handle and care for such vehicles within any parking space owned, controlled, or operated by it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

32807.

The authority may receive, control, and order the expenditure of any and all money and funds pertaining to parking facilities or related properties, including but not limited to:

(a) All revenue derived from operations of the authority.

(b) All money appropriated or made available by the city.

(c) The proceeds of all financial aid or assistance by the city, the State, or the Federal Government.

(d) The proceeds of assessments levied pursuant to this part.

(e) The proceeds of all bonds issued pursuant to this part.

(f) The proceeds of all general obligation, revenue, or other bonds issued by the city for parking facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

32808.

The authority may invest funds held in reserve, or sinking funds, or funds not required for immediate disbursement, in property or securities in which cities may legally invest funds subject to their control. No such investment shall be made in contravention of any covenant or agreement with the holders of any bonds of the authority issued and outstanding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

32809.

The authority may borrow money or accept financial or other assistance from the city, the State, the Federal Government, or any other source for or in aid of any parking facility within its area of operation, and to such ends may comply with any conditions attached thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1388.)
-------------------------------------------

32810.

The authority may exercise all or any part or combination of the powers granted by this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

32811.

The authority may do and perform any and all other acts and things necessary, convenient, desirable, or appropriate to carry out the provisions of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

32812.

In order that there may be no unnecessary duplication of effort or expense, the authority may provide for the furnishing of services by, and the use of facilities of, any department, office or agency of the city in lieu of, or in conjunction with, the direct provision by the authority of services and the use of facilities through employment or purchase or other means. The furnishing of such services and the use of such facilities of any such department, office or agency shall be upon such terms and conditions as may be approved by the authority and the legislative body of the city, and subject to reimbursement of the appropriate funds of the city for the reasonable value thereof. The legislative body may, from time to time, by resolution, provide for the making by the authority to the city, annually, of a payment, the amount of which shall be determined in a manner provided by such legislative body, but which shall not exceed the amount the authority would be required to pay to the city in ad valorem taxes if it were a private entity owning the same property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1388.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Property [32950. - 32957.]

32950.

An authority shall not acquire any existing parking facility by the exercise of the power of eminent domain except after public hearing. Notice of the date, time, place, and purpose of the hearing shall be published once not less than 10 nor more than 20 days prior to the hearing in a newspaper of general circulation printed and published in the city, or, if there be no such newspaper printed and published therein, by posting copies of the notice in at least three public places in the city not less than 10 nor more than 20 days prior to the date of the hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1388.)
-------------------------------------------

32950.5.

Whenever it becomes necessary to remove, relocate, or alter any property devoted to a public use as a result of condemnation proceedings brought by the authority, the cost of such removal, relocation, or alteration shall be paid by the authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1279.)
-------------------------------------------

32951.

Except when approved by the legislative body, by ordinance or resolution, property being used as a facility for the parking or storing of motor vehicles shall not be acquired by an authority, unless the project to be furnished or constructed which necessitates the acquisition of the existing facility when completed will provide a parking capacity at least three times the parking capacity provided by the existing facility.

If this section is held invalid, no existing parking facility may be acquired by an authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 215, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

32951.5.

Section 32951 shall not apply where the project to be furnished or constructed is to be leased by the authority to the city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 196.)
-------------------------------------------

32952.

The authority may lease any project acquired by it pursuant to this part to the highest responsible bidder after a notice inviting bids has been published in the city pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code. If there is no newspaper of general circulation printed or published in the city, copies of the notice shall be posted in at least three public places in the city. Publication shall be commenced or notice posted not less than 15 days prior to the date set in the notice for the opening of bids.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 357.)
-------------------------------------------

32953.

The notice inviting bids shall distinctly and specifically describe the project and the facilities which are to be leased, the period of time for which the project is to be leased, and the minimum rental to be paid under the lease. The notice shall recite that there is reserved to the authority the power to fix and determine the rates to be charged by the bidder for the parking or storing of motor vehicles.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1279.)
-------------------------------------------

32954.

If no bid which the authority finds to be reasonable and valid is received upon the original advertising, the authority need not readvertise and may operate the project itself.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1388.)
-------------------------------------------

32955.

The authority may reject any and all bids presented and readvertise; if no valid bid is received after readvertisement, the authority may operate the project itself.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

32956.

If the authority operates the project it may readvertise for bids as provided in this chapter once every year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1279.)
-------------------------------------------

32957.

Sections 32952 to 32956, inclusive, shall not apply to the lease of a project by the authority to the city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 965.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Revenue Bonds [33100. - 33148.]

33100.

As used in this chapter, “bonds” means revenue bonds issued pursuant to this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 463.)
-------------------------------------------

33101.

Bonds shall not be issued in any city until the legislative body, either at a general or a special election, submits to the electors of the city the question whether the city or the authority, or both, shall be authorized to adopt the revenue bond method of financing projects provided for in this part. If a majority of the voters voting upon the proposition favor the proposition, the authority, or the city, or both, as specified in the proposition, may from time to time issue bonds in accordance with this part. In any city in which the voters have previously authorized the issuance of general obligation bonds or revenue bonds for parking facilities an authority or the city, pursuant to Section 33552, may issue bonds without submitting such proposition to the voters.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1388.)
-------------------------------------------

33101.5.

In lieu of the submission of such question the legislative body may from time to time so submit to such electors the proposition of the issuance, by the authority or the city, pursuant to this part, of revenue bonds in a specific amount, to finance a specific project or specific projects. If at any such election a majority of the voters voting upon the proposition vote in favor thereof, the power to issue revenue bonds as provided in this part shall be operative as to the bonds so specified, and the authority, or the city, as may have been so specified, may from time to time issue revenue bonds in accordance with the provisions of this part in an amount or amounts not exceeding the amount so specified for the project or projects so specified.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1388.)
-------------------------------------------

33101.6.

Sections 33101 and 33101.5 shall not apply where the bonds are issued to finance a project which is to be leased to the city and where the principal of and interest on the bonds are to be payable from rentals paid by the city under such lease.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 965.)
-------------------------------------------

33102.

The authority shall have power to borrow money to provide funds for any project and to issue in its name revenue bonds to evidence the indebtedness created by such borrowing. The bonds of each issue shall constitute special obligations, and evidence a special indebtedness, of the authority, which shall be a charge upon, and payable, both as principal and interest, and as to any premiums upon the redemption of any thereof, solely from, such revenues and funds as are specified therein and in the proceedings for their issuance, and shall not constitute obligations, nor evidence any indebtedness, of the city, or of the State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1388.)
-------------------------------------------

33103.

All such bonds shall recite upon their face, in substance, that the bonds of each issue shall constitute special obligations, and evidence a special indebtedness, of the authority, which shall be a charge upon, and payable, both as principal and interest, and as to any premiums upon the redemption of any thereof, solely from, such revenues and funds as are specified therein and in the proceedings for their issuance, and shall not constitute obligations, nor evidence any indebtedness, of the city, or of the State, and shall also recite upon their face that they are issued under this part, which for that purpose may be designated by the short title provided for in Section 32500.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1388.)
-------------------------------------------

33104.

An authority may issue such types of bonds as it determines, including bonds on which the principal and interest are payable:

(a) Exclusively from the income and revenue of the parking facilities financed with the proceeds of the bonds, or with such proceeds and financial assistance from the State or Federal Governments or from any other source in aid of such projects.

(b) Exclusively from the income and revenue of certain designated parking facilities, whether or not such facilities were financed in whole or in part with the proceeds of the bonds, and including income or revenue from any future extension, betterment, or addition to any such parking facilities thereafter to be established.

(c) From its revenues generally.

(d) From any contributions or other financial assistance from the city, the State or Federal Governments, or from any other source.

(e) From parking meter revenue of the city which may be appropriated by the governing body of the city.

(f) From any combination of these sources.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1388.)
-------------------------------------------

33105.

Bonds may be additionally secured by the pledging of, placing a charge upon, or otherwise making available any parking meter revenue. Until all bonds so secured have been paid, the legislative body of a city may allocate, pledge, place a charge upon, or otherwise make available its parking meter revenue or special taxes for periods of years for the financing or operation of any project authorized by this part and the payment of principal and interest on all or any type of bond issued and outstanding pursuant to this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1388.)
-------------------------------------------

33105.5.

Nothing in this part nor in the specification, in the proceedings for the issuance of any bonds, of the sources of payment thereof, shall preclude any of the following:

(a) The payment of interest on or principal of any such bonds out of sums received as premiums or accrued interest on the sale thereof.

(b) The payment of principal of or interest on, or premiums on the redemption of, any such bonds out of the proceeds of the sale of refunding bonds issued for that purpose.

(c) The payment of any interest on any such bonds accruing during, and for not to exceed two years after, the period of the construction of a project on account of which they were issued, or for any other reasonably limited period, out of the proceeds of the sale of such bonds.

(d) The payment of any principal of, interest on, or premiums on the redemption of, any such bonds by the purchasers thereof, or by any entity other than the authority issuing the same in any case where such purchasers or entity may have guaranteed such payment.

(e) The application to the payment of any principal of, interest on, or premiums on the redemption of, any such bonds of any funds which the authority may lawfully so apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1388.)
-------------------------------------------

33106.

Except as limited by express provision of this part, each authority, by resolution, or by contract, or other agreement with, or for the benefit of, the bondholders, may determine all the terms and conditions of each issue, series, or division of bonds and of their sale and issuance, and all matters necessary or appropriate in connection with the bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1388.)
-------------------------------------------

33107.

An authority may provide for the aggregate principal amount, date or dates, maturities, interest rate or rates, interest payment dates, denominations and form of such bonds, and may provide for the issuance thereof as serial bonds or sinking fund bonds, as payable to bearer or to named payees, or as registered bonds, and for the issuance thereof with or without coupons, and for the subsequent registration of bonds, and for all other terms and conditions upon which they shall be executed, issued, secured, sold, paid, redeemed, funded, and refunded.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1388.)
-------------------------------------------

33107.5.

The authority may provide that any resolution or resolutions adopted in connection with the authorization of any bonds shall constitute a contract with the holders of such bonds, not subject to repeal, and not subject to any modification other than to the extent and in a manner provided in any such resolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1388.)
-------------------------------------------

33108.

Reference on the face of the bonds to any such resolution by the date of its adoption, or to any such contract or other agreement by the date of its execution, or the apparent date on the face thereof, is sufficient to incorporate all of the provisions of the contract or agreement into the body of the bonds and their appurtenant coupons. Each taker and subsequent holder of the bonds or coupons, whether the coupons are attached to or detached from the bonds, has recourse to all of the provisions of the indenture and is bound thereby.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1388.)
-------------------------------------------

33109.

The authority may provide for such covenants and agreements on the part of the authority as it deems necessary or advisable for the better security of any bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1388.)
-------------------------------------------

33110.

The authority may provide for the making of a covenant requiring the authority to pay punctually the principal and interest on any bonds on the date or dates, at the place or places, and in the manner mentioned in the bonds and coupons in accordance with their terms.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1388.)
-------------------------------------------

33111.

The authority may provide for the making of a covenant requiring the authority to continuously operate in an efficient and economical manner any or all facilities and properties any revenues of which are charged with the payment of any bonds in connection with which such covenant is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1388.)
-------------------------------------------

33112.

The authority may provide for the making of a covenant requiring the authority to make all repairs, renewals and replacements necessary to the operation of any or all facilities and properties any revenues of which are charged with the payment of any bonds in connection with which such covenant is made, and to keep any and all such facilities and property at all times in good repair.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1388.)
-------------------------------------------

33114.

The authority may provide for the making of a covenant requiring the authority to pay and discharge from the funds available for that purpose all lawful claims for labor, materials and supplies, or other charges which if unpaid may become a lien or charge upon all or any part of the revenue, any facilities or properties, revenues charged with the payment of any bonds in connection with which the covenant is made, or physical properties of the project which may impair the security of the bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1388.)
-------------------------------------------

33115.

The authority may provide for the making of a covenant which limits, restricts, or prohibits the power of the authority to mortgage or otherwise encumber, sell, lease, or dispose of any or all facilities and properties, any revenues of which are charged with the payment of any bonds in connection with which the covenant is made, or to enter into any lease or agreement which might impair or impede the operation of such facilities or properties, or any part thereof, or might otherwise impair or impede the rights of bondholders with respect to such revenues.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1388.)
-------------------------------------------

33116.

The authority may provide for the making of a covenant requiring the authority to fix, prescribe and collect, with respect to any or all properties, any revenues of which are charged with the payment of any bonds in connection with which such covenant is made, fees, tolls, rentals or other charges in connection with the services and facilities furnished from any such properties operated by it, and to fix and collect rentals or other charges for any such properties leased by it to others for operation, sufficient, with such parking meter revenues or other funds as may have been made available for and charged with such payment, to pay the principal of and interest on such bonds as they become due and payable, together with all expenses of operation, maintenance and repair of such facilities and properties, and with such additional sums as may be required for any sinking fund, reserve fund or other special fund provided for the further security of such bonds or as a depreciation charge or other charge in connection with such facilities and properties, and all other charges payable out of any revenues charged with the payment of the bonds.
